dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.fat.dix
  <!-- lenza; len; 2 -->
    <pardef n="len/za__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>za</l>
          <r>za<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ez</l>
          <r>za<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- siġra; siġ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="siġ/ra__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ra</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ar</l>
          <r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sur; s; 2 -->
    <pardef n="s/ur__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ur</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>war</l>
          <r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- suq; s; 2 -->
    <pardef n="s/uq__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uq</l>
          <r>uq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wieq</l>
          <r>uq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kazzola; k; 3 -->
    <pardef n="k/azzola__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>azzola</l>
          <r>azzola<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>zazel</l>
          <r>azzola<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ziezel</l>
          <r>azzola<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- maħżen; m; 2 -->
    <pardef n="m/aħżen__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aħżen</l>
          <r>aħżen<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ħażen</l>
          <r>aħżen<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- peċluq; p; 2 -->
    <pardef n="p/eċluq__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eċluq</l>
          <r>eċluq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ċielaq</l>
          <r>eċluq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- peċpuċa; p; 3 -->
    <pardef n="p/eċpuċa__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eċpuċa</l>
          <r>eċpuċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ċapaċ</l>
          <r>eċpuċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ċiepeċ</l>
          <r>eċpuċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- mewt; m; 2 -->
    <pardef n="m/ewt__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ewt</l>
          <r>ewt<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wiet</l>
          <r>ewt<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- mula; m; 2 -->
    <pardef n="m/ula__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ula</l>
          <r>ula<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wiel</l>
          <r>ula<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- dabra; d; 2 -->
    <pardef n="d/abra__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abra</l>
          <r>abra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>babar</l>
          <r>abra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- spiża; sp; 2 -->
    <pardef n="sp/iża__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iża</l>
          <r>iża<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejjeż</l>
          <r>iża<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- bastun; b; 2 -->
    <pardef n="b/astun__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>astun</l>
          <r>astun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>saten</l>
          <r>astun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tabib; t; 2 -->
    <pardef n="t/abib__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>abib</l>
          <r>abib<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>obba</l>
          <r>abib<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tqil; tq; 2 -->
    <pardef n="tq/il__adj_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>il</l>
          <r>il<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>al</l>
          <r>il<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għani; għ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="għ/ani__adj_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ani</l>
          <r>ani<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>onja</l>
          <r>ani<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- kanna; kan; 2 -->
    <pardef n="kan/na__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- xifajk; x; 2 -->
    <pardef n="x/ifajk__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ifajk</l>
          <r>ifajk<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jafek</l>
          <r>ifajk<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tibna; tib; 2 -->
    <pardef n="tib/na__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r>na<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- sieħeb; s; 2 -->
    <pardef n="s/ieħeb__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ieħeb</l>
          <r>ieħeb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ħab</l>
          <r>ieħeb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ċanga; ċan; 2 -->
    <pardef n="ċan/ga__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ga</l>
          <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eg</l>
          <r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- beżżula; b; 2 -->
    <pardef n="b/eżżula__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eżżula</l>
          <r>eżżula<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>żieżel</l>
          <r>eżżula<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- għażiż; għ; 2 -->
    <pardef n="għ/ażiż__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ażiż</l>
          <r>ażiż<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eżież</l>
          <r>ażiż<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- tebut; t; 2 -->
    <pardef n="t/ebut__n_GD">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ebut</l>
          <r>ebut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>wiebet</l>
          <r>ebut<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="lenza"><i>len</i><par n="len/za__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="siġra"><i>siġ</i><par n="siġ/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sur"><i>s</i><par n="s/ur__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="suq"><i>s</i><par n="s/uq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kazzola"><i>k</i><par n="k/azzola__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="maħżen"><i>m</i><par n="m/aħżen__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="peċluq"><i>p</i><par n="p/eċluq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="peċpuċa"><i>p</i><par n="p/eċpuċa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mewt"><i>m</i><par n="m/ewt__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mula"><i>m</i><par n="m/ula__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="dabra"><i>d</i><par n="d/abra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="spiża"><i>sp</i><par n="sp/iża__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bastun"><i>b</i><par n="b/astun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tabib"><i>t</i><par n="t/abib__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tqil"><i>tq</i><par n="tq/il__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għani"><i>għ</i><par n="għ/ani__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kanna"><i>kan</i><par n="kan/na__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xifajk"><i>x</i><par n="x/ifajk__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tibna"><i>tib</i><par n="tib/na__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sieħeb"><i>s</i><par n="s/ieħeb__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċanga"><i>ċan</i><par n="ċan/ga__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="beżżula"><i>b</i><par n="b/eżżula__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għażiż"><i>għ</i><par n="għ/ażiż__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tebut"><i>t</i><par n="t/ebut__n_GD"/></e>
